District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-615.02

Employee bill of rights.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1502, 25 DCR 5740
Oct. 7, 1998, D.C. Law 12-160, § 102(b), 45 DCR 5147
1981 Ed., § 1-616.2.
1973 Ed., § 1-345.2.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-615.01.